Utah statutes.
46-1-8.   Impartiality.

(1)  A notary may not influence a person to enter into or to refuse to enter into a lawful transaction involving a notarial act by the notary.

(2)  A notary shall perform notarial acts in lawful transactions for any requesting person who tenders the appropriate fee specified in Section 46-1-12.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 287, 1998 General Session

